Louisiana, session 2026, HB873.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:412(A)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6), (B)(1) and (2), and (C)(1) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:402.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§402.4. Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund Account
A. There is hereby created, as a special dedicated fund account in the state
treasury, the "Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund", hereinafter referred to
as the "account".
B. After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and after a sufficient amount is allocated from that account to pay all of the
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-387 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 873
obligations secured by the full faith and credit of the state which become due and
payable within any fiscal year, the treasurer shall pay into the account an amount
equal to the monies generated by the supplemental fees as provided in R.S.
32:412(A)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6), (B)(1) and (2), and (C)(1).
C. The monies in the account shall be appropriated by the legislature to the
Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and the Administration of Criminal
Justice and shall be used solely for the following purposes:
(1) Providing grants to state, parish, and municipal law enforcement agencies
for the acquisition of pursuit intervention technology, including but not limited to
GPS tracking projectiles, remote-deployment tire deflation devices, and
vehicle-tethering systems.
(2) Providing grants to state, parish, and municipal law enforcement agencies
for the development and implementation of training programs for the safe
deployment of pursuit intervention devices and technology.
(3) Administrative costs of the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement
and the Administration of Criminal Justice associated with the grant program, not to
exceed five percent of the annual fund balance.
* * *
§412. Amount of fees; credit or refund; duration of license; veteran designation;
special needs or accommodation designations; disbursement of funds;
renewal by mail or electronic commerce of Class "D" or "E" drivers' licenses;
disposition of certain fees; exception
A.(1) Every applicant for a Class "D" driver's license, or for a renewal of a
Class "D" driver's license, except those bona fide residents of the city of New
Orleans, shall pay for such basic license a fee of forty-two forty-four dollars and
seventy-five cents. Eleven dollars and fifteen cents of the fee shall be paid to the
Louisiana State Police Retirement System Fund. One dollar and fifty cents of the fee
shall be forwarded by the department to the litter abatement account which is created
within the Conservation Fund through the provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-387 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 873
dollars of the fee shall be forwarded by the department to the Pursuit Safety and
Officer Technology Fund Account as a supplemental pursuit safety fee.
(2) The fee for Class "D" driver's licenses, or renewal of a Class "D" driver's
license, issued to bona fide residents of the city of New Orleans shall be fifty-four
fifty-six dollars, fifteen dollars of which shall be payable by the department to the
board of trustees of the police pension fund of the city of New Orleans. One dollar
and eighty-four cents of the fee shall be paid to the Louisiana State Police Retirement
System Fund. One dollar and fifty cents of the fee shall be forwarded by the
department to the litter abatement account which is created within the Conservation
Fund through the provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two dollars of the fee shall be
forwarded by the department to the Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund
Account as a supplemental pursuit safety fee.
(3) There shall be a fee of seven nine dollars and fifty cents for an
emergency vehicle endorsement for any vehicle group. Two dollars of the fee shall
be forwarded by the department to the Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund
Account as a supplemental pursuit safety fee.
* * *
(5) Every applicant for a Class "E" driver's license, or for a renewal of a
Class "E" driver's license, except those bona fide residents of the city of New
Orleans, shall pay for such basic license a fee of twenty twenty-two dollars and
twenty-five cents, which shall be the cost of such basic license. Five dollars and
sixty-three cents of the fee shall be paid to the Louisiana State Police Retirement
System Fund. One dollar and fifty cents of the fee shall be forwarded by the
department to the litter abatement account which is created within the Conservation
Fund through the provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two dollars of the fee shall be
forwarded by the department to the Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund
Account as a supplemental pursuit safety fee.
(6) The fee for a Class "E" driver's license, or renewal of a Class "E" driver's
license, issued to bona fide residents of the city of New Orleans shall be twenty
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-387 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 873
twenty-two dollars and twenty-five cents, three dollars and seventy-five cents of
which shall be paid by the department to the board of trustees of the police pension
funds of the city of New Orleans. Three dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee
shall be paid to the Louisiana State Police Retirement System Fund. One dollar and
fifty cents of the fee shall be forwarded by the department to the litter abatement
account which is created within the Conservation Fund through the provisions of
R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two dollars of the fee shall be forwarded by the department to
the Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund Account as a supplemental pursuit
safety fee.
* * *
B.(1) Every applicant for a Class "A", "B", or "C" commercial driver's
license, or for a renewal of a basic Class "A", "B", or "C" commercial driver's
license, except for those bona fide residents of the city of New Orleans, shall pay for
such basic license a fee of sixty-one sixty-three dollars and fifty cents. Sixteen
dollars and twenty cents of the fee shall be paid to the Louisiana State Police
Retirement System Fund. One dollar and fifty cents of the fee shall be forwarded by
the department to the litter abatement account which is created within the
Conservation Fund through the provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two dollars of the
fee shall be forwarded by the department to the Pursuit Safety and Officer
Technology Fund Account as a supplemental pursuit safety fee.
(2) The fee for a basic Class "A", "B", or "C" commercial driver's license, or
for the renewal of a basic Class "A", "B", or "C" commercial driver's license, issued
to bona fide residents of the city of New Orleans shall be seventy-six seventy-eight
dollars and fifty cents, fifteen dollars of which fee shall be paid by the department
to the board of trustees of the police pension fund of the city of New Orleans. Fifteen
dollars of the fee shall be paid to the Louisiana State Police Retirement System Fund.
One dollar and fifty cents of the fee shall be forwarded by the department to the litter
abatement account which is created within the Conservation Fund through the
provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(15). Two dollars of the fee shall be forwarded by the
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-387 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 873
department to the Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund Account as a
supplemental pursuit safety fee.
* * *
C.(1) The addition of a motorcycle or motor scooter endorsement to a basic
license will require, besides the specific examination for such vehicles, the payment
of an additional fee of twelve fourteen dollars. If the motorcycle endorsement is to
any license which is valid for less than six years, the fee for the endorsement will be
six eight dollars. Two dollars of the fee shall be forwarded by the department to the
Pursuit Safety and Officer Technology Fund Account as a supplemental pursuit
safety fee.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.